North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-23 State Real Estate Commission
43-23-12.2.
Duties supersede common law.

The duties of a real estate brokerage firm, and the firm’s licensees, as specified in this chapter or in rules adopted to implement this chapter, supersede any fiduciary duties of that real estate brokerage firm and the firm’s licensees, to a person based on common-law principles of agency to the extent that those common-law fiduciary duties are inconsistent with the duties specified in this chapter or in rules adopted to implement this chapter.

A client is not liable for a wrongful act, an error, an omission, or a misrepresentation made by a licensee in connection with the licensee providing brokerage services for the client, including brokerage services provided under a subagency relationship, unless the client knows or should have known of the wrongful act, error, omission, or misrepresentation or unless the licensee is repeating a misrepresentation made by the client. This subsection supersedes any conflicting common-law duty of the client.

A real estate brokerage firm that is providing brokerage services to a client is not liable for a wrongful act, an error, an omission, or a misrepresentation made by the client, listing agent of another real estate brokerage firm, or subagent of another real estate brokerage firm, unless the real estate brokerage firm knew or should have known of the wrongful act, error, omission, or misrepresentation or unless the client, listing agent of another real estate brokerage firm, or subagent of another real estate brokerage firm is repeating a misrepresentation made by the real estate brokerage firm.

This section does not limit the liability of a licensee under section 43-23-11.1 nor of a client for substantial and willful misrepresentations made in reference to a real estate transaction. As used in this section, the term “real estate brokerage firm” includes the firm and brokers and agents who work for the firm.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 411, § 4; 2001, ch. 381, § 1.

43-23-12.3.
Brokerage firm may appoint agents.

A real estate brokerage firm, through a designated broker, may appoint in writing to a client the licensee or licensees within the brokerage firm who will act as appointed agent of that client to the exclusion of all other licensees within the brokerage firm.

If a real estate brokerage firm appoints an appointed agent for clients of the agency who are, or may be, parties in the same real estate transaction, the brokerage firm and its licensees are not dual agents as to those clients, and there is no imputation of knowledge or information among or between said clients, the real estate brokerage firm, and the appointed agents.

Nothing in this section prevents a real estate brokerage firm from entering a dual agency relationship with its clients after complying with any disclosure requirements provided by this chapter or by rules adopted under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 411, § 5.

43-23-13.
Fees.

Fees for real estate brokers and real estate salespersons are as follows:

A fee of not more than two hundred dollars, as set by the commission, must accompany an application for an individual’s real estate broker’s license and for each annual renewal of the license.

For each license issued to a partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, trust, cooperative, or other firm or entity, foreign or domestic, and for each annual renewal of the license, a fee of not more than two hundred dollars, as set by the commission.

For an individual’s real estate salesperson’s license and for each annual renewal of the license, a fee of not more than two hundred dollars, as set by the commission.

The commission shall set and collect reasonable fees to help offset the cost of operating the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 293, § 13; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 43-2313; S.L. 1967, ch. 354, §§ 5, 7; 1967, ch. 355, § 9; 1983, ch. 485, § 1; 1987, ch. 531, § 2; 1989, ch. 528, § 2; 1991, ch. 466, § 10; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 433, § 1; 1995, ch. 410, § 9; 1995, ch. 412, § 1; 2003, ch. 367, § 1.

Cross-References.

Bonding of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-01-11, 44-01-12, and 44-01-14 and N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-21.

Real estate education fund, additional fees paid into, see N.D.C.C. § 43-23.2-02.

43-23-13.1.
License renewal.

Every person licensed to practice as a real estate broker or real estate salesperson shall register annually with the commission and pay the appropriate annual renewal fee as provided in section 43-23-13. The application for renewal must be accompanied by such certification as required by this chapter and rules of the commission to show compliance with the educational requirements of sections 43-23-08 and 43-23-08.2, and must be submitted to the commission with the appropriate fee no later than the application deadline set by the commission. A licensee that fails to file a timely application for the renewal of any license and pay the renewal fee on or before the application deadline may file a late renewal application, together with the required educational certification, before January fifteenth of the subsequent year and shall pay, in addition to the renewal fee, a late fee as set by the commission for each month or fraction of a month after the application deadline. Any license not renewed by January fifteenth must be canceled. The cancellation must be performed without any notice or opportunity for hearing. Any person whose license has been canceled and which desires relicensure must be required to satisfy the application and examination requirements for prospective licensees in accordance with this chapter and rules of the commission.

A licensee may not engage in any activity after December thirty-first of any year for which a license is required under this chapter unless that person’s license has been renewed by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 485, § 2; 1991, ch. 466, § 11; 1991, ch. 468, § 2; 1995, ch. 410, § 10; 2003, ch. 367, § 2; 2015, ch. 300, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 316, § 11, effective August 1, 2021.

43-23-14.
Fund handling by broker. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 358, § 2.

43-23-14.1.
Handling of funds by brokers.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, every broker, at all times, shall maintain in the broker’s name or firm name, a separate, noninterest-bearing trust account designated as such in a federally insured financial institution in this state in which the broker immediately shall place as a demand deposit all funds not the broker’s own coming into the broker’s possession, in accordance with rules adopted by the commission. This requirement extends to funds in which the broker may have some future interest or claim and includes earnest money deposits. A broker may not commingle the broker’s personal funds or other funds in a trust account, except a broker may deposit and keep a sum not to exceed five hundred dollars in the account from the broker’s personal funds, which sum must be specifically identified and deposited to cover service charges related to the trust account. In conjunction with the account, the broker shall maintain at the broker’s usual place of business, books, records, contracts, and other necessary documents so the adequacy of the account may be determined at any time. Trust accounts and other records must be open to inspection by the commission and the commission’s duly authorized agents at all times during regular business hours at the broker’s usual place of business.

A broker that does not accept trust funds in real estate brokerage transactions and which has applied for and received a waiver from the real estate commission is not required to maintain a designated trust account. However, if a broker does not maintain a trust account and later receives trust funds in a real estate brokerage transaction, the broker shall open a designated trust account as required by this section and deposit any trust funds in accordance with rules adopted by the commission. A broker shall maintain a record tracking the earnest money associated with all transactions even if the funds are deposited directly with the title company and the broker does not take possession of the funds.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 358, § 1; 1981, ch. 447, § 3; 1999, ch. 384, § 1; 2021, ch. 316, § 12, effective August 1, 2021.

43-23-15.
Real estate courses — Studies.

The commission may conduct or hold or assist in conducting or holding real estate courses or institutes, and incur and pay the necessary expenses in connection therewith, which courses or institutes must be open to any licensee without any charge or fee.

The commission may assist libraries, real estate brokers and real estate salespersons, and institutes and foundations, with financial aid or otherwise, in providing texts, sponsoring studies, surveys, and programs for the benefit of real estate and the elevation of the real estate business.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 293, § 15; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 43-2315; S.L. 1991, ch. 466, § 12.

43-23-16.
Licensee list.

The executive director shall maintain a list online of the names and addresses of all licensees licensed by the board under the provisions of this chapter, together with such other information relative to the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter as the board may deem of interest to the public.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 293, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 43-2316; S.L. 1999, ch. 278, § 70; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2007, ch. 370, § 5; 2021, ch. 316, § 13, effective August 1, 2021.

43-23-17.
Penalty.

Any person violating section 43-23-05 is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. Any person violating section 43-23-14.1 is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 293, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 43-2317; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 495; 2009, ch. 359, § 6; 2015, ch. 300, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

43-23-18.
Injunctions authorized to enforce law.

If any person or entity has engaged in any act or practice that constitutes or will constitute a violation of this chapter, the commission may commence an action in the district court of the county in which the person or entity resides or in the district court of the county in which the act or practice occurred for an injunction to enforce compliance with this chapter or rules adopted by the commission. The commission is not required to give any bond for commencing this action. Upon a showing that the person or entity has engaged in any act or practice in violation of this chapter or rules adopted by the commission, the district court may enjoin the act or practice and may make any order necessary to conserve, protect, and disburse any funds involved.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 413, § 1.

43-23-19.
Errors and omissions insurance required of salespersons and brokers — Rules.

The real estate commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 28-32 requiring as a condition of licensure that all real estate salespersons and brokers, except those which hold inactive licenses, carry errors and omissions insurance covering all activities contemplated under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 382, § 1; 2021, ch. 316, § 14, effective August 1, 2021.

43-23-20.
Group insurance coverage authorized — Independent errors and omissions coverage.

The real estate commission may negotiate by bid with an insurance provider for a group policy under which coverage is available to all licensees with no right on the part of the insurer to cancel coverage provided to any licensee, except as provided by rules adopted by the commission. A licensee may obtain errors and omissions insurance independently if the coverage complies with the minimum requirements established by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 382, § 1.

43-23-21.
Commission to determine conditions of errors and omissions coverage.

The real estate commission shall determine the terms and conditions of errors and omissions coverage required by this chapter, including the minimum limits of coverage, the permissible deductible, and the permissible exceptions.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 382, § 1.

43-23-22.
Notice of terms and conditions of errors and omissions — Certificate of coverage.

Each licensee must be notified of the required terms and conditions of coverage at least thirty days before the annual license renewal date. A certificate of coverage, showing compliance with the required terms and conditions of coverage, must be filed annually with the real estate commission by each licensee who elects not to participate in the group insurance program administered by the real estate commission.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 382, § 1.

43-23-23.
Errors and omissions coverage not required if premium limit unobtainable.

If the real estate commission is unable to obtain errors and omissions insurance coverage at a reasonable premium, the errors and omissions insurance requirement of this section does not apply during the year for which coverage cannot be obtained.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 382, § 1; 2007, ch. 371, § 1.